Connecticut, session 2026, SB00424.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) For the fiscal year ending June
2 30, 2027, and each fiscal year thereafter, the State Department of
3 Education shall annually compile and make publicly available on its
4 Internet web site data organized by school district showing the number
5 of students in a public school, grades kindergarten to twelve, inclusive,
6 with a plan pursuant to Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as
7 amended from time to time. The department shall track trends in such
8 data. All local and regional boards of education shall provide any
9 information necessary for the department to compile such data. The
10 department shall disaggregate and post such information in a manner
11 that complies with the requirements of the Family Educational Rights
12 and Privacy Act, 20 USC 1232g, as amended from time to time.
sSB424 / File No. 361 1

sSB424 File No. 361
13 Sec. 2. (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) The Commissioner of Education shall,
14 within available appropriations, convene a working group to review
15 how local and regional boards of education are providing
16 accommodations to students under plans pursuant to Section 504 of the
17 Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended from time to time, including the
18 use of staff and the amount of staff time dedicated to the development
19 and implementation of such plans. The working group shall include, but
20 need not be limited to, representatives from the Connecticut Education
21 Association, Connecticut School Counselor Association, American
22 Federation of Teachers-Connecticut, Connecticut Association of Boards
23 of Education, Connecticut Association of Public School
24 Superintendents, Connecticut Chapter of the National Association of
25 Social Workers and Connecticut Association of School Psychologists.
26 (b) Not later than January 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Education
27 shall submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
28 of the general statutes, to the joint standing committees of the General
29 Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to education and
30 government oversight. Such report shall include, but need not be
31 limited to, any best practices for plans pursuant to Section 504 of the
32 Rehabilitation Act of 1973, recommendations for statutory changes, if
33 applicable, and a summary and analysis of the impact of such plans and
34 their usage since 2020.
35 Sec. 3. Section 10-15o of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
36 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
37 October 1, 2026):
38 (a) There is established an Office of the Educational Ombudsperson,
39 which shall be within the Office of Governmental Accountability for
40 administrative purposes only. The Office of the Educational
41 Ombudsperson shall serve students and families of students in the
42 pursuit of preschool, elementary and secondary education, special
43 education, vocational education and adult education. The Office of the
44 Educational Ombudsperson shall be under the direction of an
45 Educational Ombudsperson who shall be appointed by the Governor
sSB424 / File No. 361 2

sSB424 File No. 361
46 and be selected from among individuals with expertise and experience
47 in educational advocacy, special education and educational law.
48 (b) The Office of the Educational Ombudsperson shall:
49 (1) Receive, review and attempt to resolve any complaints from
50 students and students' families, including, but not limited to, attempts
51 to resolve such complaints in collaboration with schools and educators;
52 (2) Compile and analyze data on students and young people, through
53 available data systems, including, but not limited to, the Connecticut
54 Preschool through Twenty and Workforce Information Network,
55 established pursuant to section 10a-57g;
56 (3) Assist employees of local and regional boards of education
57 involved in planning and placement team meetings;
58 (4) Provide information to the public, agencies, legislators and others
59 regarding the issues and concerns of students and make
60 recommendations for resolving such issues and concerns;
61 (5) Analyze and monitor the development and implementation of
62 federal, state and local laws, regulations and policies relating to students
63 and recommend any changes the Educational Ombudsperson deems
64 necessary;
65 (6) Disseminate information concerning the availability of the Office
66 of the Educational Ombudsperson to assist students and families of
67 students, as well as local and regional boards of education with
68 educational resource concerns;
69 (7) On and after July 1, 2027, prioritize the office's efforts on those
70 school districts that have been identified in the study conducted
71 pursuant to section 10-76ooo as disproportionately or over-identifying
72 minority students for special education and related services; [and]
73 (8) Employ legal staff and legal counsel as necessary to perform the
74 duties and responsibilities under subdivision (1) of this subsection;
sSB424 / File No. 361 3

sSB424 File No. 361
75 (9) Hold hearings, subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance,
76 administer oaths, take the testimony of any person under oath and
77 require the production for examination of any books and papers relating
78 to any matter under investigation or in question;
79 (10) Require written answers to interrogatories under oath relating to
80 any complaint under investigation pursuant to this chapter alleging any
81 discriminatory practice, as described in subdivision (6) of subsection (b)
82 of section 46a-64, as amended by this act, and adopt regulations, in
83 accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, for the procedure for the
84 issuance of interrogatories and compliance with interrogatory requests;
85 (11) Utilize such voluntary and uncompensated services of private
86 individuals, agencies and organizations as may from time to time be
87 offered and needed and with the cooperation of such agencies to carry
88 out the provisions of this section; and
89 [(8)] (12) Take any other actions necessary to fulfill the duties of the
90 Office of the Educational Ombudsperson and the Educational
91 Ombudsperson as set forth in this subsection.
92 (c) On or before January 1, [2026] 2027, and annually thereafter, the
93 Educational Ombudsperson shall submit a report, in accordance with
94 the provisions of section 11-4a, to the Office of Governmental
95 Accountability and the joint standing committees of the General
96 Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to education and
97 children. The Educational Ombudsperson shall report on: (1) The
98 implementation of this section; (2) the overall effectiveness of the
99 Educational Ombudsperson position; [and] (3) the number of
100 complaints received pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of this
101 section during the prior year, how many complaints were substantiated
102 or unsubstantiated, whether any corrective action was taken and the
103 average of time it took to process such complaints; and (4) additional
104 steps that need to be taken for the Educational Ombudsperson to be
105 more effective.
106 Sec. 4. Section 46a-64 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
sSB424 / File No. 361 4

sSB424 File No. 361
107 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
108 October 1, 2026):
109 (a) It shall be a discriminatory practice in violation of this section: (1)
110 To deny any person within the jurisdiction of this state full and equal
111 accommodations in any place of public accommodation, resort or
112 amusement because of race, creed, color, national origin, ancestry, sex,
113 gender identity or expression, marital status, age, lawful source of
114 income, intellectual disability, mental disability, physical disability,
115 including, but not limited to, blindness or deafness, status as a veteran,
116 status as a victim of domestic violence, status as a victim of sexual
117 assault or status as a victim of trafficking in persons, of the applicant,
118 subject only to the conditions and limitations established by law and
119 applicable alike to all persons; (2) to discriminate, segregate or separate
120 on account of race, creed, color, national origin, ancestry, sex, gender
121 identity or expression, marital status, age, lawful source of income,
122 intellectual disability, mental disability, learning disability, physical
123 disability, including, but not limited to, blindness or deafness, status as
124 a veteran, status as a victim of domestic violence, status as a victim of
125 sexual assault or status as a victim of trafficking in persons; (3) for a
126 place of public accommodation, resort or amusement to restrict or limit
127 the right of a mother to breast-feed her child; (4) for a place of public
128 accommodation, resort or amusement to refuse entry to a person with a
129 disability who is accompanied by a service animal; or (5) to deny any
130 person with a disability or any person training an animal as a service
131 animal to assist a person with a disability, accompanied by such service
132 animal, full and equal access to any place of public accommodation,
133 resort or amusement. Any person with a disability or any person
134 training an animal as a service animal may keep such service animal at
135 all times in such place of public accommodation, resort or amusement
136 at no extra charge, provided such service animal is in the direct custody
137 and control of such person. When it is not obvious what service an
138 animal provides, staff of a place of public accommodation, resort or
139 amusement may inquire of the owner or keeper whether such animal is
140 a service animal required because of a disability and what work or task
141 the animal has been trained to perform. Nothing in this subsection shall
sSB424 / File No. 361 5

sSB424 File No. 361
142 preclude a business owner's ability to recover for damage caused to a
143 person or property by a service animal. For the purposes of this
144 subsection, "disability" and "service animal" have the same meanings as
145 provided in section 22-345 and "place of public accommodation, resort
146 or amusement" has the same meaning as provided in section 46a-44.
147 (b) (1) The provisions of this section with respect to the prohibition of
148 sex discrimination shall not apply to (A) the rental of sleeping
149 accommodations provided by associations and organizations which
150 rent all such sleeping accommodations on a temporary or permanent
151 basis for the exclusive use of persons of the same sex, or (B) separate
152 bathrooms or locker rooms based on sex.
153 (2) The provisions of this section with respect to the prohibition of
154 discrimination on the basis of age shall not apply to minors or to special
155 discount or other public or private programs to assist persons sixty
156 years of age and older.
157 (3) The provisions of this section with respect to the prohibition of
158 discrimination on the basis of physical disability shall not require any
159 person to modify his property in any way or provide a higher degree of
160 care for a physically disabled person, including, but not limited to blind
161 or deaf persons, than for a person not physically disabled.
162 (4) The provisions of this section with respect to the prohibition of
163 discrimination on the basis of creed shall not apply to the practice of
164 granting preference in admission of residents into a nursing home as
165 defined in section 19a-490, if (A) the nursing home is owned, operated
166 by or affiliated with a religious organization, exempt from taxation for
167 federal income tax purposes, and (B) the class of persons granted
168 preference in admission is consistent with the religious mission of the
169 nursing home.
170 (5) The provisions of this section with respect to the prohibition of
171 discrimination on the basis of lawful source of income shall not prohibit
172 the denial of full and equal accommodations solely on the basis of
173 insufficient income.
sSB424 / File No. 361 6

sSB424 File No. 361
174 (6) The provisions of this section with respect to the prohibition of
175 discrimination on the basis of intellectual disability, mental disability or
176 physical disability that concern a student with an individualized
177 education program or a plan pursuant to Section 504 of the
178 Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended from time to time, and where the
179 place of public accommodation is a public school, shall be enforced by
180 complaint made to the Office of the Educational Ombudsperson in lieu
181 of the commission.
182 (c) Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be
183 guilty of a class D misdemeanor.
184 Sec. 5. Subsection (a) of section 46a-82 of the 2026 supplement to the
185 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
186 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
187 (a) Any person claiming to be aggrieved by an alleged discriminatory
188 practice, except for an alleged violation of section 4a-60g or 46a-68, [or]
189 the provisions of sections 46a-68c to 46a-68f, inclusive, or section 46a-64,
190 as amended by this act, that is described in subdivision (6) of subsection
191 (b) of section 46a-64, as amended by this act, may, by himself or herself
192 or by such person's attorney, file with the commission a complaint in
193 writing under oath, except that a complaint that alleges a violation of
194 section 46a-64c need not be notarized. The complaint shall state the
195 name and address of the person alleged to have committed the
196 discriminatory practice, provide a short and plain statement of the
197 allegations upon which the claim is based and contain such other
198 information as may be required by the commission. The commission
199 whenever it has reason to believe that a person who is named as party
200 to a discriminatory practice complaint has engaged or is engaged in
201 conduct that constitutes a violation of part VI, of chapter 952, may refer
202 such matter to the Office of the Chief State's Attorney and said office
203 shall conduct a further investigation as deemed necessary. After the
204 filing of a complaint, the commission shall provide the complainant
205 with a notice that: (1) Acknowledges receipt of the complaint; and (2)
206 advises of the time frames and choice of forums available under this
sSB424 / File No. 361 7

sSB424 File No. 361
207 chapter.
208 Sec. 6. (NEW) (Effective from passage) The Commissioner of Education
209 shall implement changes to the special education data system
210 developed by the Department of Education to better adapt its use for
211 plans pursuant to Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as
212 amended from time to time, and the differing requirements of such
213 plans compared to individualized education programs. Such changes
214 shall ensure, at a minimum, that the reporting requirements for plans
215 pursuant to Section 504 of said act be limited to: (1) Student
216 demographic information, (2) the evaluation period, (3) identification of
217 behavioral, social and emotional needs of students, (4) the type of
218 accommodation provided, (5) requirements related to case management
219 or social workers, (6) any additional testing performed, (7) the
220 identification of accessibility technologies utilized, and (8) any other
221 information required under sections 10-76a to 10-76h, inclusive, of the
222 general statutes, to the extent permitted by the Family Educational
223 Rights and Privacy Act, 20 USC 1232g, as amended from time to time.
224 Sec. 7. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) Not later than July 1, 2027, and
225 annually thereafter, each local and regional board of education shall
226 report to the Department of Education, for students of the school district
227 who have plans pursuant to Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of
228 1973, as amended from time to time and for which the board is
229 responsible for implementing such plan: (1) The number of students
230 with such plan by grade level, (2) the types of supports given to
231 students, and (3) the number of complaints made by parents of the
232 students with such plans. The department shall disaggregate such
233 information in a manner that complies with the requirements of the
234 Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 USC 1232g, as amended
235 from time to time.
236 Sec. 8. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) The Department of Education
237 shall provide increased oversight and coordination with local and
238 regional boards of education to support students with plans pursuant
239 to Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended from time
sSB424 / File No. 361 8

sSB424 File No. 361
240 to time.
241 Sec. 9. (Effective from passage) (a) Not later than January 1, 2027, the
242 Department of Education shall perform a needs assessment of the
243 number of social workers and school counselors required to attain an
244 ideal student-to-counselor and social worker ratio, specified by
245 elementary, middle and high school student need, for students with
246 individualized education programs and plans pursuant to Section 504
247 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended from time to time.
248 (b) Not later than January 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Education
249 shall submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
250 of the general statutes, to the joint standing committees of the General
251 Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to education and
252 government oversight. Such report shall include the results of the needs
253 assessment and recommendations for the ideal student-to-counselor
254 and social worker ratio, specified by elementary, middle and high
255 school for students with such programs or plans.
256 Sec. 10. (Effective from passage) The Commissioner of Social Services
257 shall identify any services that local and regional boards of education
258 provide that could be eligible for Medicaid reimbursement to leverage
259 federal funding for school or support services. Not later than December
260 31, 2026, the commissioner shall submit a report, in accordance with the
261 provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing
262 committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
263 relating to human services, government oversight and appropriations
264 and the budgets of state agencies. Such report shall include a detailed
265 listing of any identified services that could be eligible for such
266 reimbursement.
267 Sec. 11. (Effective from passage) Not later than December 31, 2026, the
268 Chief Workforce Officer of the Office of Workforce Strategy shall
269 develop and report a strategic assessment plan to increase the capacity
270 of school social workers and school counselors in the state to the General
271 Assembly, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the
272 general statutes.
sSB424 / File No. 361 9

sSB424 File No. 361
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 10-15o
Sec. 4 October 1, 2026 46a-64
Sec. 5 October 1, 2026 46a-82(a)
Sec. 6 from passage New section
Sec. 7 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 8 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 9 from passage New section
Sec. 10 from passage New section
Sec. 11 from passage New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1, the first sentence was reworded for clarity, in Section 2,
"establish" was changed to "convene" and " how local and regional
boards of education are providing accommodations to students under"
was added for clarity, in Sections 6, 8 and 9, references to the Bureau of
Special Education were deleted for statutory consistency, in Sections 6
and 7 references to FERPA were added to avoid potential conflicts with
federal law, and in Section 7 the first sentence was reworded for clarity.
GOS Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sSB424 / File No. 361 10

sSB424 File No. 361
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Education, Dept. GF - Cost 581,100 131,100
Office of Workforce Strategy GF - Cost Up to None
100,000
State Comptroller - Fringe GF - Cost 90,900 90,900
Benefits1
Governmental Accountability, GF - Cost 86,000 86,000
Off.
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which makes various changes relating to student plans
pursuant to section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (504 plans),
results in the fiscal impacts described by section below.
Sections 1 and 7 result in a one-time cost of $150,000 in FY 27 to the
State Department of Education (SDE) related to collecting and reporting
data regarding 504 plans. The funding is required to build systems to
integrate data from CT-SEDS (state special education data system) into
SDE's data warehouse to facilitate the reporting requirements.
Section 2 establishes a working group to review how boards of
education are developing and implementing 504 plans, which results in
no fiscal impact as the work group has the necessary resources and
1The fringe benefit costs for most state employees are budgeted centrally in accounts
administered by the Comptroller. The estimated active employee fringe benefit cost
associated with most personnel changes is 41.82% of payroll in FY 27.
sSB424 / File No. 361 11

sSB424 File No. 361
expertise to fulfil the requirements.
Sections 3 – 5 empower the Office of the Educational Ombudsperson2
(OEO) to employ legal staff to conduct hearings, subpoena witnesses,
and require depositions, as well as designate OEO to receive complaints
related to discrimination against students with IEPs or 504 plans,
resulting in a General Fund cost of $122,000 annually beginning in FY
27.
This cost is associated with hiring one additional position3 within the
Office of Governmental Accountability (OGA) and includes an ongoing
annual salary cost of $86,000 and an associated fringe cost of $36,000
beginning in FY 27. This position is necessary to support the expanded
scope of work created with additional legal and investigative
responsibilities created by these sections.
Section 6 requires SDE to update the CT-SEDS system to include
reporting for various information about students with 504 plans and
such 504 plans. This results in a one-time development cost of $300,000
to SDE in FY 27 to modify the CT-SEDS system for such data collection
and integration.
Section 8 requires SDE to provide increased oversight of and
coordination with school districts regarding 504 plans, which results in
a cost of $131,100 to SDE and corresponding fringe benefits of $54,900
annually beginning in FY 27 to hire one full time education consultant.
Section 9 requires SDE to perform a needs assessment of the number
of social workers and school counselors required to attain an ideal
student to counselor ratio. This has no fiscal impact as SDE is currently
developing a workload analysis that studies this topic.
Section 10 requires the Department of Social Services to identify and
report on Medicaid-eligible school services by December 31, 2026, which
results in no fiscal impact as the department already possesses the
2 The Office of the Educational Ombudsperson is currently vacant.
3 This position is a Staff Attorney I.
sSB424 / File No. 361 12

sSB424 File No. 361
necessary resources and expertise to fulfill the requirements of the bill.
Section 11 results in a one-time cost of up to $100,000 in FY 27 only
by requiring the Office of Workforce Strategy (OWS) to develop a
strategic assessment plan to increase the capacity of school social
workers and school counselors in the state. In order to complete this
plan by December 31, 2026, OWS will require consulting services which
are anticipated to cost up to $100,000.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation.
sSB424 / File No. 361 13

sSB424 File No. 361
OLR Bill Analysis
sSB 424
AN ACT CONCERNING OVERSIGHT OF PLANS PURSUANT TO
SECTION 504 OF THE REHABILITATION ACT OF 1973 AND
SPECIAL EDUCATION NEEDS IN THE STATE.